Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
COUNTING MAIL BALLOTS

Cross references:

In 2013, this part 2 was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-201. Appointment of election judges for counting mail ballots.

If the county clerk and recorder or designated election official has mailed or delivered mail ballots to five hundred or more electors, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall appoint, in addition to the voter service and polling center judges appointed to staff voter service and polling centers described in section 1-7.5-107, at least three counting judges, not more than two of whom shall be from any one major political party. For each additional five hundred mail ballots so mailed or delivered, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official may appoint additional counting judges as needed.

In all political subdivisions in which electronic or electromechanical voting systems are used, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official, for each five hundred mail ballots mailed or delivered, may appoint, in addition to the voter service and polling center judges appointed to staff voter service and polling centers as described in section 1-7.5-107, five counting judges, not more than three of whom shall be from any one major political party in a partisan election.

In political subdivisions to which this section applies and in the event that only two major political parties are represented, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall make the appointments so that one major political party is represented by a majority of election judges on the mail ballot receiving board and the other major political party is represented by a majority of election judges on the mail ballot counting board. The county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall appoint those electors certified by the county party chairpersons of the major political parties to the county clerk and recorder as mail ballot receiving judges and mail ballot counting judges. If an elector certified by a major political party is not willing or able to serve, then the major political party that certified the elector may certify a replacement judge to the county clerk and recorder. If the major political parties do not certify a sufficient number of mail ballot receiving and counting judges, the county clerk and recorder may appoint a sufficient number of qualified electors to serve as mail ballot receiving and counting judges.

In all political subdivisions to which this section applies, where the county clerk and recorder or designated election official has appointed one or more student election judges pursuant to article 6 of this title, the student election judge shall be appointed to serve as a judge for the purpose of counting mail ballots pursuant to this section; except that the student election judge need not satisfy any party affiliation required of election judges by this section.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 737, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-202. Hours a counting place open for receiving and counting mail ballots.

The election officials at the counting place may receive and prepare for tabulation mail ballots delivered and turned over to them by the county clerk and recorder or designated election official.

Counting of the mail ballots may begin fifteen days prior to the election and shall continue until counting is completed.

The election officials in charge of the counting place shall take all precautions necessary to ensure the secrecy of the counting procedures, and no information concerning the count may be released by the election officials or watchers until after 7 p.m. on election day.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 738, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-203. Delivery of mail ballots to supervisor judge.

At any time during the fifteen days prior to and including the election day, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall deliver to the counting place judges all the mail ballot envelopes received up to that time in packages or in ballot boxes that are locked and secured with a numbered seal, and the record of mail ballots as provided for in section 1-7.5-106.5 (3) for which a receipt will be given. The county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall continue to deliver any envelopes containing mail ballots that may be received thereafter up to and including 7 p.m. on election day.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 739, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-204. Preparing to count mail ballots - rejections.

Before opening any mail ballot, one of the receiving judges, in the presence of a majority of the receiving judges, shall inspect the self-affirmation on the return envelope.

The self-affirmation is valid if:

The self-affirmation was completed by the elector;

The self-affirmation was signed by the elector or, if the elector is unable to sign, marked by the elector with or without assistance and witnessed by another person; and

In any election conducted by a county clerk and recorder, the signature on the self-affirmation matches the signature stored in the statewide voter registration system, or the eligible elector's marks on the application and the self-affirmation were witnessed by other persons.

If the self-affirmation is valid, the receiving judge shall open the envelope without defacing the self-affirmation or mutilating the enclosed ballot.

For the purposes of subparagraph (III) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the signatures on an eligible elector's self-affirmation and stored in the statewide voter registration system shall be compared in the manner prescribed by section 1-7.5-107.3.

If the self-affirmation on the return envelope is invalid, the election judges shall mark the envelope "rejected" and shall write on the envelope the reason for the rejection. The envelope shall be set aside without being opened, and the ballot, if cured, shall be counted.

If it appears to the election judges, by sufficient proof, that a mail ballot sent to an elector who died before receiving the ballot contains a forged affidavit, the envelope containing the ballot of the deceased voter shall not be opened, and the election judges shall make notation of the death and fraudulent signature on the back of the envelope. The ballot shall be forwarded to the district attorney for investigation of a violation of section 1-13-106. If a mail ballot envelope contains more than one marked ballot of any one kind, none of the ballots shall be counted, and the election judges shall write the reason for rejection.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 739, § 92, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 565, § 20, effective May 9.

1-7.5-205. Counting mail ballots.

Mail ballots and any ballots cast at a voter service and polling center in lieu of a mail ballot must be counted after delivery of the ballots as provided in section 1-7.5-203 and after preparation of the ballots as provided in section 1-7.5-204.

Mail ballots must be counted in one of the following ways:

In counties that use paper ballots, the mail ballots may be counted in the same manner as paper ballots.

Any county may use electronic vote-tabulating equipment for the counting of mail ballots in the same manner provided for the counting of ballots in part 6 of article 5 and parts 4 and 5 of article 7 of this title.

Ballots that are cast directly on electronic or electromechanical vote-tabulating equipment at a voter service and polling center in lieu of a mail ballot shall be counted in the same manner as provided for the counting of ballots in part 6 of article 5 and parts 4 and 5 of article 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 740, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-206. Paper ballots or electronic system.

In political subdivisions using a ballot card electronic voting system, mail ballots may be cast on paper ballots or may be cast on ballot cards and counted by electronic voting equipment, or both methods may be used.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 740, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-207. Voter verification - mail ballot information.

Each county clerk and recorder shall provide electors, upon request, with information on whether the mail ballot cast by the elector was received by the county clerk and recorder, including an online mail ballot tracking system or response by other electronic or telephonic means.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 740, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-208. Certificate of mail ballots cast - survey of returns.

Repealed.

Upon the survey of the returns of the political subdivision by the board of canvassers formed pursuant to section 1-10-101 or 1-10-201, the board shall include in its abstract of votes the votes cast in the voter service and polling center and counted at the counting place in the manner provided for abstracting votes cast and counted in accordance with article 10 of this title.

The returns certified by the judges and the abstract of votes cast certified by the canvass board shall, except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), indicate the number of votes cast in each precinct for each candidate and for and against each ballot issue and ballot question and the number of ballots rejected, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).
(3) (a) (I) The returns certified by the judges and the abstract of votes cast certified by the canvass board shall, except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), indicate the number of votes cast in each precinct for each candidate and for and against each ballot issue and ballot question and the number of ballots rejected, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

For primary and coordinated elections, the judges and canvass board shall either:

Certify the votes cast in each precinct pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a); or

Certify on the returns and the abstract of votes cast the number of votes cast on each ballot style for each candidate and for and against each ballot issue and ballot question and the number of ballots rejected.

If the total number of votes cast and counted in any precinct is less than ten, the returns for all such precincts in the political subdivision shall be reported together.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 740, § 92, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1) repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1261, § 2, effective May 31.

1-7.5-209. Preservation of rejected mail ballots.

All identification envelopes and mail ballots rejected by the election judges in accordance with section 1-7.5-204 must be returned to the designated election official. All mail ballots received by the county clerk and recorder or designated election official after 7 p.m. on the day of the election, together with the rejected mail ballots returned by the election judges as provided in this section, must remain in the sealed identification envelopes and may be destroyed as provided in section 1-7-802.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 741, § 92, effective May 10.

1-7.5-210. Maintenance of mail ballot election voting records - transmittal of such records to secretary of state.

The county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall maintain a record identifying the name and voting address of each elector who casts a ballot by mail or at a voter service and polling center at any election.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 741, § 92, effective May 10.